Nevada, session 83, SB98.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 385.007 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385.007 As used in this title, unless the context otherwise
requires:
1. “Challenge school” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 388D.305.
2. “Charter school” means a public school that is formed
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 388A of NRS.
3. “Department” means the Department of Education.
4. “English learner” has the meaning ascribed to it in 20 U.S.C.
§ 7801(20).
5. “Homeschooled child” means a child who receives
instruction at home and who is exempt from compulsory enrollment
and attendance pursuant to NRS 392.070.
6. “Language other than English” means a form of human
communication, other than the English language, that:
(a) Consists of a system of sounds, letters, symbols or signs
that are recognized and utilized by humans;
(b) Is used to:
(1) Interact and negotiate meaning with other people;
(2) Understand and analyze oral, written or signed texts;
and
(3) Create culturally appropriate oral, written or signed
products and presentations for specific audiences and tasks;
(c) Allows people to investigate, explain and reflect on the
relationship between the products, practices and perspectives of a
particular culture;
(d) Allows people to exchange information about shared
experiences, make arguments, empathize with other people and
creatively express themselves orally, visually or in writing;
(e) Is capable of being used to share stories relevant to a
culture or community; and
(f) Forms the basis for a specific community of people who use
the language.
7. “Local school precinct” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 388G.535.
[7.] 8. “Public schools” means all kindergartens and
elementary schools, junior high schools and middle schools, high
schools, charter schools and any other schools, classes and
educational programs which receive their support through public
taxation and, except for charter schools, whose textbooks and
courses of study are under the control of the State Board.
-
*SB98*

– 3 –
[8.] 9. “School bus” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 484A.230.
[9.] 10. “School counselor” or “counselor” means a person
who holds a license issued pursuant to chapter 391 of NRS and an
endorsement to serve as a school counselor issued pursuant to
regulations adopted by the Commission on Professional Standards
in Education or who is otherwise authorized by the Superintendent
of Public Instruction to serve as a school counselor.
[10.] 11. “School psychologist” or “psychologist” means a
person who holds a license issued pursuant to chapter 391 of NRS
and an endorsement to serve as a school psychologist issued
pursuant to regulations adopted by the Commission on Professional
Standards in Education or who is otherwise authorized by the
Superintendent of Public Instruction to serve as a school
psychologist.
[11.] 12. “School social worker” or “social worker” means a
social worker licensed pursuant to chapter 641B of NRS who holds
a license issued pursuant to chapter 391 of NRS and an endorsement
to serve as a school social worker issued pursuant to regulations
adopted by the Commission on Professional Standards in Education
or who is otherwise authorized by the Superintendent of Public
Instruction to serve as a school social worker.
[12.] 13. “State Board” means the State Board of Education.
[13.] 14. “University school for profoundly gifted pupils” has
the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 388C.040.
Sec. 2. NRS 388.593 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.593 A school district, charter school and university school
for profoundly gifted pupils that participates in the State Seal of
Biliteracy Program established pursuant to NRS 388.591 must
award a pupil, upon graduation from high school, a high school
diploma with a State Seal of Biliteracy if the pupil:
1. Successfully completes all courses of study in English
language arts that are required for graduation with at least a 2.0
grade point average, on a 4.0 grading scale;
2. Demonstrates proficiency in one or more languages other
than English:
(a) By passing an advanced placement examination in a [world]
language other than English with a score of 3 or higher or passing
an international baccalaureate examination in a [world] language
other than English with a score of 4 or higher; or
(b) By passing an examination in a [world] language [,] other
than English, if the examination is approved by the board of
trustees of a school district or the governing body of a charter school
or university school for profoundly gifted pupils, as applicable; and
-
*SB98*

– 4 –
3. If the primary language of the pupil is not English,
demonstrates proficiency in English on an assessment designated by
the Department.
Sec. 3. NRS 389.520 is hereby amended to read as follows:
389.520 1. The Council shall:
(a) Establish standards of content and performance, including,
without limitation, a prescription of the resulting level of
achievement, for the grade levels set forth in subsection 5, based
upon the content of each course, that is expected of pupils for the
following courses of study:
(1) English language arts;
(2) Mathematics;
(3) Science;
(4) Social studies, which includes only the subjects of
history, geography, economics, civics, financial literacy and
multicultural education;
(5) The arts;
(6) Computer education and technology, which includes
computer science and computational thinking;
(7) Health;
(8) Physical education; and
(9) A [foreign or world] language [.] other than English.
(b) Establish a schedule for the periodic review and, if
necessary, revision of the standards of content and performance. The
review must include, without limitation, the review required
pursuant to NRS 390.115 of the results of pupils on the
examinations administered pursuant to NRS 390.105.
(c) Assign priorities to the standards of content and performance
relative to importance and degree of emphasis and revise the
standards, if necessary, based upon the priorities.
2. The standards for computer education and technology must
include a policy for the ethical, safe and secure use of computers
and other electronic devices. The policy must include, without
limitation:
(a) The ethical use of computers and other electronic devices,
including, without limitation:
(1) Rules of conduct for the acceptable use of the Internet
and other electronic devices; and
(2) Methods to ensure the prevention of:
(I) Cyber-bullying;
(II) Plagiarism; and
(III) The theft of information or data in an electronic
form;
(b) The safe use of computers and other electronic devices,
including, without limitation, methods to:
-
*SB98*

– 5 –
(1) Avoid cyber-bullying and other unwanted electronic
communication, including, without limitation, communication with
on-line predators;
(2) Recognize when an on-line electronic communication is
dangerous or potentially dangerous; and
(3) Report a dangerous or potentially dangerous on-line
electronic communication to the appropriate school personnel;
(c) The secure use of computers and other electronic devices,
including, without limitation:
(1) Methods to maintain the security of personal identifying
information and financial information, including, without limitation,
identifying unsolicited electronic communication which is sent for
the purpose of obtaining such personal and financial information for
an unlawful purpose;
(2) The necessity for secure passwords or other unique
identifiers;
(3) The effects of a computer contaminant;
(4) Methods to identify unsolicited commercial material; and
(5) The dangers associated with social networking Internet
sites; and
(d) A designation of the level of detail of instruction as
appropriate for the grade level of pupils who receive the instruction.
3. The standards for social studies must include multicultural
education, including, without limitation, information relating to
contributions made by men and women from various racial and
ethnic backgrounds. The Council shall consult with members of the
community who represent the racial and ethnic diversity of this
State in developing such standards.
4. The standards for health must include mental health and the
relationship between mental health and physical health.
5. The Council shall establish standards of content and
performance for each grade level in kindergarten and grades 1 to 8,
inclusive, for English language arts and mathematics. The Council
shall establish standards of content and performance for the grade
levels selected by the Council for the other courses of study
prescribed in subsection 1.
6. The Council shall forward to the State Board the standards
of content and performance established by the Council for each
course of study. The State Board shall:
(a) Adopt the standards for each course of study, as submitted
by the Council; or
(b) If the State Board objects to the standards for a course of
study or a particular grade level for a course of study, return those
standards to the Council with a written explanation setting forth the
reason for the objection.
-
*SB98*

– 6 –
7. If the State Board returns to the Council the standards of
content and performance for a course of study or a grade level, the
Council shall:
(a) Consider the objection provided by the State Board and
determine whether to revise the standards based upon the objection;
and
(b) Return the standards or the revised standards, as applicable,
to the State Board.
 The State Board shall adopt the standards of content and
performance or the revised standards, as applicable.
8. The Council shall work in cooperation with the State Board
to prescribe the examinations required by NRS 390.105.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Computer contaminant” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 205.4737.
(b) “Cyber-bullying” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 388.123.
(c) “Electronic communication” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 388.124.
Sec. 4. 1. During the 2025-2026 Interim, the Department of
Education shall study the possible establishment and
implementation of a requirement that, to receive an endorsement to
teach a language other than English, a teacher must have received
education in:
(a) Language acquisition theory and language development
practices;
(b) Methods and curriculum for teaching learners of languages
other than English;
(c) Assessment and evaluation of learners of languages other
than English; and
(d) Policies, critical issues and best practices for learners of
languages other than English.
2. When conducting the study required by subsection 1, the
Department shall solicit input from:
(a) The Professional Language Association of Nevada, or its
successor organization;
(b) Faculty members at institutions within the Nevada System of
Higher Education who teach languages other than English,
including, without limitation, such faculty members at the
University of Nevada, Reno, the University of Nevada, Las Vegas,
the College of Southern Nevada and Nevada State University; and
(c) Any other person or entity whose input the Department
deems necessary.
3. On or before August 1, 2026, the Department shall:
-
*SB98*

– 7 –
(a) Compile a report of the study conducted pursuant to
subsection 1, which must include, without limitation:
(1) A proposal and timetable for implementing the
requirements described in subsection 1 or a detailed explanation of
the reasons that implementing those requirements is not
recommended at this time;
(2) A description of the potential benefits and drawbacks of
implementing the requirements described in subsection 1;
(3) A description of any significant obstacles to
implementing the requirements described in subsection 1; and
(4) Recommendations for any legislation necessary to
implement the requirements described in subsection 1, if the
Department recommends implementing those requirements.
(b) Submit the report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to the Joint Interim Standing Committee on
Education and the 84th Regular Session of the Legislature; and
(c) Present the report at a meeting of the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Education.
4. As used in this section, “language other than English” has
the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 385.007, as amended by section 1
of this act.
Sec. 5. In preparing supplements to the Nevada Administrative
Code, the Legislative Counsel shall:
1. Substitute appropriately the term “language other than
English” for the term “world language.”
2. Remove the definition of “world language” codified as
NAC 389.046.
Sec. 6. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB98*